Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1558.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.85, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Access to data. Notwithstanding deleted text begin section 13.384 or 13.85deleted text end new text begin any other law to the contrarynew text end , the director has access to corrections and detention data deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ,new text end medical datanew text begin , and criminal investigative datanew text end maintained by an agency new text begin or political subdivision new text end and classified as private data on individuals or confidential data on individuals to the extent the data is necessary for the office to perform its duties under this section.